New York, session 2025-2026, A4266.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (d) and (e) of subdivision 1 of section 410-w of 2 the social services law, as amended by section 2 of part U of chapter 56 3 of the laws of 2023, are amended and a new paragraph (f) is added to 4 read as follows: 5 (d) families with incomes up to eighty-five percent of the state medi- 6 an income, who are attending a post secondary educational program; [and] 7 (e) other families with incomes up to eighty-five percent of the state 8 median income in accordance with criteria established by the depart- 9 ment[.]; and 10 (f) victims of domestic violence as defined in section four hundred 11 eighty-one-c of this chapter who are in need of assistance in order for 12 a parent or caretaker relative to engage in work or participate in work 13 activities pursuant to the provisions of title nine-B of article five of 14 this chapter. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04101-01-5